Illinois, session 104th, HB3540.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, 5and Persons with Disabilities Act is amended by adding Section 64.1 as follows: 7    (30 ILCS 575/4.1 new)8    Sec. 4.1. Term of certification. Certifications granted 9under this Act on or after the effective date of this 10amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly shall be active 11for a minimum of 5 years. Certified vendors shall inform the 12Program of any changes in the vendor's business status or 13ownership that may impact the vendor's certification status. 14Program staff shall inform the vendor at least 6 months before 15the vendor's certification expires.